Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202048-2614
Prohibited conduct.

(1) An athlete agent, with the intent to induce a student-athlete to enter into an agency contract, may not:

(a) Give any materially false or misleading information or make a materially false promise or representation;

(b) Furnish anything of value to a student-athlete before the student-athlete enters into the agency contract; or

(c) Furnish anything of value to any individual other than the student-athlete or another registered athlete agent.

(2) An athlete agent may not intentionally:

(a) Initiate contact with a student-athlete unless registered under the Nebraska Uniform Athlete Agents Act;

(b) Refuse or fail to retain or permit inspection of the records required to be retained by section 48-2613;

(c) Fail to register when required by section 48-2604;

(d) Provide materially false or misleading information in an application for registration or renewal of registration;

(e) Predate or postdate an agency contract; or

(f) Fail to notify a student-athlete before the student-athlete signs or otherwise authenticates an agency contract for a particular sport that entering into negotiations for, or signing, a professional-sports-services contract may make the student-athlete ineligible to participate as a student-athlete in that sport.

Laws 2009, LB292, § 14;

Laws 2020, LB962, § 11.
November 14, 2020